Louisiana, session 2026, HB202.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:375.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§375.1. Vacancies in classified state civil service positions; announcement of job
vacancies; required information; notice of rejection
A. The Department of State Civil Service shall list the salary or salary range
within each job announcement for a vacant classified position.
B. If an individual applies for a vacant classified position posted by the
Department of State Civil Service and is rejected or the vacancy has been filled, the
department shall notify the applicant of the rejection or that the vacancy has been
filled, as applicable.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.